Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB110.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The title of the act of June 24, 1976 (P.L.424, No.101), referred to as the Emergency and Law Enforcement Personnel Death Benefits Act, is amended to read:AN ACTProviding for the payment of death benefits to [the surviving spouse or children or parents of] firefighters, ambulance service or rescue squad members, law enforcement officers [or], National Guard members [who die] or a surviving spouse, 12345678910111213141516171819 children or parents after death or suicide as a result of the performance of [their] the firefighters', ambulance service or rescue squad members', law enforcement officers' or National Guard members' duties.Section 2. Section 1 of the act is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1. * * *(a.2) A firefighter, ambulance service or rescue squad member, law enforcement officer, certified hazardous material response team member , member of the Pennsylvania Civil Air Patrol or National Guard member shall be presumed to have died as the direct and proximate result of a personal injury sustained in the line of duty if one of the following apply:(1) The individual died while influenced by a diagnosed psychiatric disorder due to on-duty exposure to one or more traumatic events.(2) The individual acted within 45 days of the end of an exposure to a traumatic event while in the line of duty and brought about the individual's death while influenced by an undiagnosed psychiatric disorder.* * *Section 3. Section 2 of the act is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 2. The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Personal injury sustained in the line of duty" means at least one of the following:(1) A post-traumatic stress injury , acute stress disorder or 20250SB0110PN0514 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 trauma and stress related disorder diagnosed by a licensed medical or mental health professional due to on-duty exposure to one or more traumatic events and where the exposure was a substantial factor in the diagnosis of the disorder.(2) A post-traumatic stress injury , acute stress disorder or trauma and stress related disorder suffered by an individual who has contacted or attempted to contact the employee assistance program of the agency or entity that the individual serves, a licensed medical or mental health professional, suicide prevention services or another mental health assistance service in order to receive help, treatment or diagnosis for post-traumatic stress injury or acute stress disorder due to exposure while in the line of duty.(3) An undiagnosed post-traumatic stress injury, acute stress disorder or trauma and stress related disorder suffered in the line of duty while exposed to one or more traumatic events if the exposure is discovered to have been a substantial factor in the personal injury."Post-traumatic stress injury" means as defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 75A01 (relating to definitions).* * *"Traumatic event" means an incident or exposure:(1) resulting in serious bodily injury or death to an individual;(2) involving a minor who has been injured, killed, abused or exploited;(3) involving an immediate threat to the life of the claimant or another individual;(4) involving mass casualties; or (5) responding to crime scenes for investigations. 20250SB0110PN0514 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 4. Section 3 of the act is amended to read:Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately and its provisions shall be retroactive to January 1, [1976] 2019, and shall be applicable to the deaths of all firefighters, ambulance service or rescue squad members and law enforcement personnel [dying] sustaining a personal injury resulting in death on and after said date as the direct result of injuries sustained in the performance of their duties, regardless of the date when such injuries occurred.Section 5. The addition of section 1(a.2) and the definitions of "personal injury sustained in the line of duty" and "traumatic event" in section 2 of the act shall apply to all claims for benefits under the act arising on or after January 1, 2019.Section 6. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0110PN0514 - 4 - 123456789101112131415